South Dakota, session 2026, HB1077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 39-4-2 be AMENDED:
39-4-2. For the purposes of this title, food is deemed to be adulterated:
(1) If any substance has been mixed and packed with the food to reduce, lower, or
injuriously affect the food's quality or strength;
(2) If any substance has been substituted wholly or in part for the food;
(3) If any valuable constituent of the food has been wholly or in part abstracted;
(4) If the food is mixed, colored, powdered, coated, or stained to conceal damage or
inferiority;
(5) If the food contains any poisonous or otherwise deleterious ingredient, added or
natural, which may render the food injurious to health, provided that when the
food is being prepared for shipment, it is preserved by an external application
applied so that the preservative is necessarily removed mechanically, or by
maceration in water, or otherwise before eating, and directions for the removal of
the preservative are plainly and conspicuously printed on the label of the package,
the provisions of this chapter are construed as applying only when the products
are ready for consumption;
(6) If it consists in whole or in part of:
(a) A filthy, decomposed, or putrid animal or vegetable substance;
(b) Any portion of any animal unfit for food;
(c) Any product of a portion of a diseased animal or of an animal that has been
fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse or other substance unfit
for animal food, or of an animal that has died otherwise than by slaughter;

26.700.10 2 1077
(7) If in the manufacture, sale, distribution, transportation, or in the offering or
exposing for sale, distribution, or transportation, it is not at all times securely
protected from all filth, flies, dust, contamination, or other unclean, unhealthful, or
insanitary conditions; or
(8) If it is a cultivated-protein food product.
For purposes of this section, "cultivated-protein food product" means a food
product having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating
from an agricultural food animal but that is derived from manufacturing cells, including
processes in which stem cells that were initially isolated from an agricultural food animal
are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a manufacturing process.
HB1077 ENROLLED

26.700.10 3 1077
An Act to consider a cultivated-protein food product to be adulterated food.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1077
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1077 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1077 ENROLLED